Connecticut, session 2026, SB00004.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) As used in this section and
sections 2 to 10, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) "Accessible deletion mechanism" means the mechanism
established pursuant to subsection (a) of section 5 of this act;
(2) "Applicant" means any data broker that submits an application for
an initial registration, or for a registration renewal, under subsection (b)
of section 2 of this act;
(3) "Brokered personal data" means one or more of the following
personal data elements concerning a consumer, if categorized or
organized for sale or license to a third party: (A) Name; (B) address; (C)
date of birth; (D) place of birth; (E) mother's maiden name; (F) unique
biometric data (i) generated from measurement or technical analysis of
a human body characteristic, including, but not limited to, a fingerprint,
retina or iris image or other unique physical or digital representation of
biometric data, and (ii) used by the owner or licensee of such unique
biometric data to identify or authenticate the consumer; (G) name or

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
address of a member of the consumer's immediate family or household;
(H) Social Security number or other government-issued identification
number; or (I) other information that, alone or in combination with the
other information sold or licensed, would allow a reasonable person to
identify the consumer with reasonable certainty;
(4) "Business" (A) means (i) any person who regularly engages in
commercial activities for the purpose of generating income, (ii) any
bank, Connecticut credit union, federal credit union, out-of-state bank,
out-of-state trust company or out-of-state credit union, as such terms are
defined in section 36a-2 of the general statutes, and (iii) any other person
who controls, is controlled by or is under common control with any
person described in subparagraph (A)(i) or (A)(ii) of this subdivision,
and (B) does not include any body, authority, board, bureau,
commission, district or agency of this state or of any political
subdivision of this state;
(5) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection;
(6) "Consumer" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-515
of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(7) "Data broker" means any business or, if such business is not an
individual, any portion of such business that sells or licenses brokered
personal data to another person;
(8) "Data service provider" means any person who maintains
personal data on behalf of a registered data broker;
(9) "Deletion request" means any request submitted by a consumer
under subparagraph (A)(i) of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section
5 of this act;
(10) "Department" means the Department of Consumer Protection;
Public Act No. 26-64 2 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
(11) "HIPAA" means the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 USC 1320d et seq., as amended from time
to time;
(12) "License" (A) means to grant access to, or distribute, brokered
personal data in exchange for consideration, and (B) does not include
using any personal data for the sole benefit of the person who provided
such personal data if such person maintains control over the use of such
personal data;
(13) "Minor" means any consumer who is younger than eighteen
years of age;
(14) "Participating consumer" means any consumer who submits a
verified deletion request;
(15) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-515 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(16) "Personal data" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-
515 of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(17) "Registered data broker" means any data broker that is actively
registered as a data broker in accordance with the provisions of section
2 of this act; and
(18) "Unregistered data broker" means any data broker that is not
actively registered as a data broker in accordance with the provisions of
section 2 of this act.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Except as provided in
section 7 of this act, no data broker shall sell or license brokered personal
data in this state on or after January 1, 2027, unless the data broker is
actively registered with the Department of Consumer Protection in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
Public Act No. 26-64 3 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section and section 7
of this act, a data broker that intends to sell or license brokered personal
data in this state shall submit to the Department of Consumer
Protection, in a form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner of
Consumer Protection, an application for an initial registration as a data
broker. Each application for an initial registration as a data broker shall
be accompanied by an initial registration fee in the amount of two
thousand five hundred dollars. Each initial registration issued pursuant
to this subsection shall expire on December thirty-first of the year in
which such initial registration was issued, and may be renewed for
successive one-year terms upon submission of a registration renewal
application made in the manner set forth in this subsection for an initial
application and payment of a registration renewal fee in the amount of
two thousand five hundred dollars. All fees collected under this
subsection shall be deposited in the data broker registration account
established in section 8 of this act.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, each
application submitted to the Department of Consumer Protection under
subsection (b) of this section shall disclose: (1) The applicant's name,
mailing address and an actively monitored electronic mail address and
telephone number; (2) the address of the applicant's primary Internet
web site; (3) the address of a publicly accessible Internet web page on
the applicant's primary Internet web site that (A) does not make use of
any dark pattern, as defined in section 42-515 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, and (B) details how a consumer may exercise each
of the rights afforded to the consumer under subsection (a) of section
42-518 of the general statutes, as amended by this act; (4) whether the
applicant collects (A) minors' personal data, or (B) consumers' precise
geolocation data or reproductive or sexual health data, as such terms are
defined in section 42-515 of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(5) the measures the applicant will take to ensure that no personal data
are sold or licensed in violation of the provisions of sections 1 to 10,
Public Act No. 26-64 4 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
inclusive, of this act or sections 42-515 to 42-526, inclusive, of the general
statutes, as amended by this act; (6) whether, and to what extent, the
applicant or any of its subsidiaries is regulated under (A) the Fair Credit
Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq., as amended from time to time, (B)
Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC 6801 et seq., and the
regulations adopted thereunder, as said act and such regulations may
be amended from time to time, (C) section 38a-38 of the general statutes,
or (D) the privacy, security and breach notification rules issued by the
United States Department of Health and Human Services, 45 CFR Parts
160 and 164, as amended from time to time; (7) for a registration renewal
application submitted on or after July 1, 2029, the statement the
applicant most recently posted on a publicly accessible Internet web
page on such applicant's primary Internet web site pursuant to section
6 of this act; (8) for a registration renewal application submitted on or
after July 1, 2031, (A) whether the applicant has undergone an audit
pursuant to subparagraph (A)(i) of subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of
section 5 of this act, and (B) if the applicant has undergone an audit
pursuant to subparagraph (A)(i) of subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of
section 5 of this act, the most recent year for which the applicant
submitted an audit report and the materials associated therewith to the
department pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of section 5 of
this act; and (9) any other information the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection requires for the purposes of this section.
(d) The Department of Consumer Protection may approve and renew
an application for registration as a data broker in accordance with the
terms of an agreement between the department and the Nationwide
Multistate Licensing System.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) No data broker shall sell or
license any personal data in violation of the provisions of sections 1 to
10, inclusive, of this act or sections 42-515 to 42-526, inclusive, of the
general statutes, as amended by this act. Each registered data broker
Public Act No. 26-64 5 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
shall establish a privacy policy which, at a minimum, shall include
measures to ensure that such registered data broker does not sell or
license any personal data in violation of the provisions of sections 1 to
10, inclusive, of this act or sections 42-515 to 42-526, inclusive, of the
general statutes, as amended by this act.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Consumer Protection shall establish, and periodically update, an
Internet web page on the Department of Consumer Protection's Internet
web site that: (1) Discloses, for each registered data broker, the
information required under subsection (c) of section 2 of this act that
was included in the application such registered data broker most
recently submitted, and the department most recently approved for
such registered data broker, under subsection (b) of section 2 of this act;
and (2) provides access to the accessible deletion mechanism established
by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of section 5 of this act.
Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) (1) Not later than July 1,
2028, the Commissioner of Consumer Protection shall establish an
accessible deletion mechanism program. As part of the accessible
deletion mechanism program, the commissioner shall establish an
accessible deletion mechanism that:
(A) Enables a consumer to (i) submit a deletion request, in a verifiable
form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, without charge to
the consumer and in any language spoken by a consumer for whom a
registered data broker has collected personal data, that all registered
data brokers and data service providers delete the consumer's personal
data, and (ii) specifically exclude one or more registered data brokers,
and all data service providers for such registered data broker or brokers,
from the consumer's deletion request;
(B) Enables a consumer to (i) securely submit, in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, (I) the consumer's motor vehicle
Public Act No. 26-64 6 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
operator's license number, and (II) additional personal data to aid in
processing the consumer's deletion request, (ii) determine the status of
the consumer's deletion request, and (iii) not more frequently than once
during any forty-five-day period, submit an update to the participating
consumer's verified deletion request in a verifiable form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, without charge to such participating
consumer and in any language spoken by a consumer for whom a
registered data broker has collected personal data;
(C) Enables a registered data broker to determine whether a
consumer has specifically excluded the registered data broker, and all
data service providers for such registered data broker, from the
consumer's deletion request or any update thereto;
(D) Does not enable a registered data broker that accesses the
accessible deletion mechanism for the purposes set forth in
subparagraph (C) of this subdivision to access any additional personal
data by way of such accessible deletion mechanism;
(E) Is readily accessible and usable by consumers with disabilities;
(F) Incorporates reasonable security safeguards, including, but not
limited to, administrative, physical and technical safeguards, to protect
consumers' personal data from any unauthorized use, disclosure,
access, destruction or modification by way of the accessible deletion
mechanism; and
(G) Provides, in a manner that is readily understandable by
consumers, (i) a description of what constitutes personal data and
therefore may be subject to a deletion request, (ii) an explanation of the
processes for a consumer to submit and update a deletion request, and
(iii) a description of the actions required under subsections (b) and (c) of
this section.
(2) (A) If a consumer submits the consumer's motor vehicle operator's
Public Act No. 26-64 7 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
license number to the commissioner for the purpose of verifying such
consumer's deletion request or any update thereto, the commissioner
shall use such consumer's motor vehicle operator's license number to
verify such deletion request or update and for no other purpose. The
commissioner shall not share, store or retain such consumer's motor
vehicle operator's license number.
(B) Each deletion request and update thereto is confidential and shall
not be deemed a public record for the purposes of the Freedom of
Information Act, as defined in section 1-200 of the general statutes.
(b) On and after August 15, 2028, and except as provided in section 7
of this act, the Commissioner of Consumer Protection, or the
commissioner's authorized agent, shall:
(1) Verify that the consumer who purportedly submitted a deletion
request or update thereto actually submitted such deletion request or
update by using such consumer's motor vehicle operator's license
number and, following such verification, update the accessible deletion
mechanism to inform each registered data broker that accesses the
accessible deletion mechanism that such deletion request or update has
been verified; and
(2) If the commissioner, or the commissioner's authorized agent,
cannot verify that the consumer who purportedly submitted a deletion
request or update thereto actually submitted such deletion request or
update, specify that all registered data brokers, and all data service
providers for such registered data brokers, that are not specifically
excluded from such unverified deletion request or such unverified
update (A) may retain any personal data such registered data brokers
and data service providers maintain concerning such consumer, and (B)
shall process such unverified deletion request or such unverified update
as an exercise of such consumer's right under subparagraph (B) of
subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 42-518 of the general statutes,
Public Act No. 26-64 8 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
as amended by this act.
(c) (1) On and after October 1, 2028, and except as provided in section
7 of this act, each registered data broker shall access the accessible
deletion mechanism at least once every forty-five days to:
(A) Examine each deletion request or update thereto to determine
whether such registered data broker, and all data service providers for
such registered data broker, are specifically excluded from such deletion
request or update; and
(B) (i) For each verified deletion request or verified update thereto
that does not specifically exclude such registered data broker, and all
data service providers for such registered data broker, and subject to the
exceptions set forth in subdivision (5) of this subsection, delete any
personal data such registered data broker maintains concerning the
participating consumer and direct all data service providers that
maintain any personal data concerning the participating consumer on
behalf of such registered data broker to delete such personal data; or
(ii) For each unverified deletion request or unverified update thereto
that does not specifically exclude such registered data broker, and all
data service providers for such registered data broker, (I) retain any
personal data such registered data broker maintains concerning the
consumer, and (II) process such unverified deletion request or such
unverified update, and direct all data service providers for such
registered data broker to process such unverified deletion request or
such unverified update, as an exercise of the consumer's right under
subparagraph (B) of subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 42-518 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act.
(2) At least once every forty-five days after a registered data broker
first deletes a participating consumer's personal data pursuant to
subparagraph (B)(i) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, repeat the
Public Act No. 26-64 9 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
actions required under subparagraph (B)(i) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection unless:
(A) Such registered data broker verifies that the participating
consumer has submitted a verified update to a verified deletion request
such participating consumer previously submitted to the accessible
deletion mechanism; and
(B) Such verified update specifically excludes such registered data
broker and all data service providers for such registered data broker
from the verified updated deletion request.
(3) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may impose a fee on
each registered data broker that accesses the accessible deletion
mechanism for the purposes of performing such registered data broker's
duties under subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection. Such fee shall
be in an amount determined by the commissioner, but shall not exceed
the cost of providing such access. All fees collected under this
subdivision shall be deposited in the data broker registration account
established in section 8 of this act.
(4) On and after October 1, 2028, and except as provided in
subdivision (5) of this subsection, no registered data broker, and no data
service provider for such registered data broker, that deletes a
participating consumer's personal data pursuant to subparagraph (B)(i)
of subdivision (1) of this subsection or subdivision (2) of this subsection
shall maintain, use or disclose any personal data such registered data
broker or data service provider subsequently acquires concerning the
participating consumer.
(5) (A) No registered data broker who maintains a participating
consumer's personal data, and no data service provider for such
registered data broker, shall be required to delete the participating
consumer's personal data, and may maintain, use or disclose such
Public Act No. 26-64 10 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
consumer's personal data, to the extent that maintaining, using or
disclosing such participating consumer's personal data is reasonably
necessary to (i) comply with any federal, state or municipal law,
ordinance or regulation, (ii) comply with any civil, criminal or
regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena or summons by any federal,
state, municipal or other governmental authority, (iii) cooperate with
any law enforcement agency concerning any conduct or activity that
such registered data broker or data service provider reasonably and in
good faith believes may violate any federal, state or municipal law,
ordinance or regulation, (iv) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for
or defend any legal claim, (v) provide any product or service specifically
requested by such participating consumer, (vi) perform pursuant to any
contract to which such participating consumer is a party, including, but
not limited to, by fulfilling the terms of a written warranty, (vii) take any
step at the request of such participating consumer prior to entering into
a contract, (viii) take any immediate step to protect any interest that is
essential for the life or physical safety of such participating consumer or
another individual, (ix) prevent, detect, protect against or respond to
any security incident, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or
deceptive activity or any illegal activity, preserve the integrity or
security of any system or investigate, report or prosecute those
responsible for any such action, (x) engage in any public or peer-
reviewed scientific or statistical research in the public interest that
adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws and is approved,
monitored and governed by an institutional review board, or a similar
independent oversight entity, that determines that (I) maintaining such
participating consumer's personal data is likely to provide substantial
benefits that do not exclusively accrue to such registered data broker or
data service provider, (II) the expected benefits of such research
outweigh the privacy risks, and (III) such registered data broker or data
service provider has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate
any privacy risk associated with such research, (xi) assist any other
person in performing any obligation imposed under sections 1 to 10,
Public Act No. 26-64 11 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
inclusive, of this act, (xii) conduct internal research to develop, improve
or repair any product, service or technology, (xiii) effectuate a product
recall, (xiv) identify and repair any technical error that impairs existing
or intended functionality, or (xv) perform internal operations that are
reasonably aligned with the expectations such participating consumer
had, or reasonably anticipated, based on such participating consumer's
existing relationship with such registered data broker.
(B) Except as provided in section 7 of this act, no registered data
broker, or data service provider for such registered data broker, that
maintains, uses or discloses a participating consumer's personal data for
any purpose set forth in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall
maintain, use or disclose the participating consumer's personal data for
any other purpose.
(d) (1) Except as provided in section 7 of this act, not later than July 1,
2031, and triennially thereafter, each registered data broker shall, at the
expense of such registered data broker, (A) retain an independent
auditor to (i) audit the books of such registered data broker to determine
whether such registered data broker is in compliance with the
provisions of subsection (c) of this section, (ii) prepare an audit report
disclosing the results of such audit, and (iii) submit such audit report,
and any materials associated therewith, to such registered data broker,
and (B) maintain each audit report, and any materials associated
therewith, that are submitted to such registered data broker pursuant to
subparagraph (A)(iii) of this subdivision for a period of at least six years
beginning on the date on which such audit report and materials are
submitted to such registered data broker.
(2) Except as provided in section 7 of this act, a registered data broker
shall submit an audit report and the materials described in
subparagraph (A)(iii) of subdivision (1) of this subsection to the
Department of Consumer Protection, in a form and manner prescribed
by the Commissioner of Consumer Protection, not later than five
Public Act No. 26-64 12 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
business days after the department sends notice to the registered data
broker disclosing that the department requires such registered data
broker to submit such audit report and materials to the department.
(e) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may enter into a
contract with one or more public or private entities (1) for any services
necessary to implement the provisions of subsections (a) to (d),
inclusive, of this section, (2) to administer the accessible deletion
mechanism program established pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, or (3) to administer a multistate accessible deletion mechanism
program.
Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Except as provided in section
7 of this act, not later than July 1, 2029, and annually thereafter, each
business that was a registered data broker during the preceding
calendar year shall post, in a form and manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Consumer Protection and on a publicly accessible
Internet web page on such business's primary Internet web site, a
statement disclosing the following information:
(1) The total number of deletion requests, inclusive of any updates
thereto, that such business accessed during the preceding calendar year
and that did not specifically exclude such business and all data service
providers for such business;
(2) The total number of deletion requests described in subdivision (1)
of this section to which such business responded by:
(A) Deleting personal data;
(B) Retaining personal data; or
(C) Deleting and retaining personal data; and
(3) If such business responded to one or more deletion requests
Public Act No. 26-64 13 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
described in subdivision (1) of this section by retaining personal data,
the total number of such deletion requests for which such business
retained personal data:
(A) On the basis of an exception set forth in subdivision (5) of
subsection (c) of section 5 of this act; or
(B) On the basis of an exemption set forth in section 7 of this act.
Sec. 7. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The provisions of sections
1 to 10, inclusive, of this act shall not apply to: (1) A consumer reporting
agency, as defined in 15 USC 1681a(f), as amended from time to time, a
person who furnishes information to a consumer reporting agency, as
provided in 15 USC 1681s-2, as amended from time to time, or a user of
a consumer report, as defined in 15 USC 1681a(d), as amended from
time to time, to the extent that the consumer reporting agency, person
or user engages in activities that are subject to regulation under the Fair
Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq., as amended from time to
time; (2) a financial institution, an affiliate or a nonaffiliated third party,
as such terms are defined in 15 USC 6809, as amended from time to time,
to the extent that the financial institution, affiliate or nonaffiliated third
party engages in activities that are subject to regulation under Title V of
the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC 6801 et seq., and the regulations
adopted thereunder, as said act and such regulations may be amended
from time to time; (3) a business that collects information concerning a
consumer if the consumer is or was (A) in a contractual relationship
with the business, (B) an investor in the business, (C) a donor to the
business, or (D) in any relationship with the business that is similar to
the relationships described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of this
subdivision; (4) a business that performs services for, or is acting as an
agent or otherwise on behalf of, a business described in subdivision (3)
of this subsection or a governmental entity; (5) a business collecting data
used for purposes of the regulation of listed chemicals as set forth in 21
USC 830, as amended from time to time; (6) a candidate committee,
Public Act No. 26-64 14 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
national committee, party committee or political committee, as such
terms are defined in section 9-601 of the general statutes; and (7) a
covered entity or business associate, as defined in 45 CFR 160.103.
(b) No provision of sections 1 to 10, inclusive, of this act shall be
construed to prohibit an unregistered data broker from engaging in any
sale or licensing of brokered personal data if such sale or licensing
exclusively involves: (1) Publicly available information that (A)
concerns a consumer's business or profession, (B) is sold or licensed as
part of a service that provides alerts for health or safety purposes, or (C)
is lawfully available from any federal, state or local government record,
unless such information is (i) collated and combined to create a
consumer profile that is made available to a user of a publicly accessible
Internet web site for compensation or free of charge, or (ii) used to
generate inferences with respect to consumers; (2) providing digital
access to any (A) journal, book, periodical, newspaper, magazine or
news media, or (B) educational, academic or instructional work; (3)
developing or maintaining an electronic commerce service or software;
(4) providing directory assistance or directory information services as,
or on behalf of, a telecommunications carrier; or (5) a one-time or
occasional disposition of the assets of a business, or any portion of a
business, as part of a transfer of control over the assets of the business
that is not part of the ordinary conduct of such business or portion of
such business.
Sec. 8. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) There is established an
account to be known as the "data broker registration account", which
shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any
moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account shall be expended by the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection for the purposes of the accessible deletion mechanism
program established pursuant to subsection (a) of section 5 of this act.
Sec. 9. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Public Act No. 26-64 15 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
Consumer Protection may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
provisions of sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 10. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Consumer Protection, after providing notice and conducting a hearing
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes,
may impose a civil penalty of not more than two hundred dollars per
day for each violation of any provision of sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of
this act. Any civil penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited in the data broker registration account established in section
8 of this act.
Sec. 11. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Consumer" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-515
of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(2) "Consumer good" means any article that is purchased, leased,
exchanged or received primarily for personal, family or household
purposes;
(3) "Consumer service" means any service that is purchased, leased,
exchanged or received primarily for personal, family or household
purposes;
(4) "Discounted price" means any price for a consumer good or
consumer service that is (A) established for, or offered to, a consumer or
group of consumers, and (B) verifiably lower than the generally
available, publicly disclosed and bona fide market price established for
the consumer good or consumer service;
(5) "Person" means any individual, association, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, trust or other legal entity;
Public Act No. 26-64 16 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
(6) "Personal data" has the same meaning as provided in section 42-
515 of the general statutes, as amended by this act;
(7) "Price setting device" means any automated or programmed
process that uses a consumer's personal data to establish a price for a
consumer good or consumer service to be sold, leased, exchanged or
provided to the consumer;
(8) "Retail seller" (A) means a retailer, as defined in section 12-407 of
the general statutes, to the extent such retailer is engaged in making
sales, at retail, of tangible personal property, and (B) includes, but is not
limited to, a retail food establishment;
(9) "Surveillance pricing" means the practice of establishing a
customized price for a consumer good or consumer service that is
specific to a consumer based, in whole or in part, on the consumer's
personal data collected (A) through any technology or technological
method, system or tool, including, but not limited to, any biometric
monitoring, camera, device tracking or sensor, that is capable of
gathering personal data concerning a consumer's behavior,
characteristics, location or other personal attributes in a physical or
digital environment, and (B) by the person establishing the customized
price either directly or indirectly by gathering, purchasing or otherwise
acquiring such personal data from a third party; and
(10) "Third-party delivery service" means a company, organization or
entity, outside of the operation of a retail food establishment's business,
that facilitates delivery or online ordering services to customers of a
retail food establishment.
(b) (1) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, any person
doing business in the state who uses a price setting device for any reason
other than to establish a discounted price for a consumer good or
consumer service to be sold, leased, exchanged or provided as part of
Public Act No. 26-64 17 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
an online transaction, and who directly or indirectly advertises or
promotes online a price established for a consumer good or consumer
service by using a price setting device, labels a consumer good with such
price online or publishes an online statement, display, image, offer or
announcement disclosing such price, shall include in such online
advertisement, promotion, label, statement, display, image, offer or
announcement the following disclosure, or a substantially similar
disclosure: "THIS PRICE WAS INCREASED BY A PRICE SETTING
DEVICE USING YOUR PERSONAL DATA".
(2) The disclosure required under subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall be readily visible to the average consumer.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, no retail
seller or third-party delivery service doing business in the state shall
engage in surveillance pricing.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the following shall not be deemed to constitute surveillance
pricing:
(A) Establishing for, or offering to, a consumer a discounted price for
a consumer service for the purpose of retaining the consumer as a
customer;
(B) Establishing for, or offering to, different consumers different
prices for the same consumer good or consumer service due to (i)
justifiable differences in the costs incurred in providing such consumer
good or consumer service to such consumers, including, but not limited
to, justifiable differences in consumer selections, delivery distances or
delivery times, or (ii) justifiable temporal differences, including, but not
limited to, justifiable temporal differences due to price fluctuations
based on supply and demand; or
(C) Establishing for, or offering to, a consumer or group of consumers
Public Act No. 26-64 18 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
a discounted price for a consumer good or consumer service (i) based
on publicly disclosed uniform terms and conditions that may be
satisfied by any consumer, including, but not limited to, by signing up
for a mailing list, disclosing personal data, registering for promotional
communications or participating in a promotional event, (ii) that is
available to all consumers who are members of a broadly defined group,
including, but not limited to, veterans or members of the armed forces,
senior citizens, students, teachers or residents of a specific area, or (iii)
through a loyalty, membership or rewards program in which
consumers must affirmatively enroll. The retail seller or third-party
delivery service shall (I) prominently post the discounted price, and the
uniform terms and conditions for such discounted price, on such retail
seller's or third-party delivery service's Internet web site in language
that is readily understandable by the average consumer, and (II) offer
such discounted price to all consumers pursuant to the uniform terms
and conditions posted on such retail seller's or third-party delivery
service's Internet web site.
(d) The provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall not
be construed to apply to:
(1) Any person licensed, authorized to operate or registered, or
required to be licensed, authorized to operate or registered, pursuant to
the insurance laws of this state;
(2) Any financial institution or affiliate thereof, as such terms are
defined in 15 USC 6809, as amended from time to time, to the extent
such financial institution or affiliate is subject to Title V of the Gramm-
Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC 6801 et seq., as amended from time to time; or
(3) Any bank, holding company or out-of-state bank, as such terms
are defined in section 36a-2 of the general statutes, or out-of-state
holding company, as defined in section 36a-410 of the general statutes,
that directly or indirectly establishes an office in the state and is subject
Public Act No. 26-64 19 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
to the supervision of, or regulation by, the Banking Commissioner
pursuant to title 36a of the general statutes.
(e) Any violation of the provisions of subsections (b) to (d), inclusive,
of this section shall constitute an unfair or deceptive trade practice for
the purposes of subsection (a) of section 42-110b of the general statutes
and shall be enforced solely by the Attorney General. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to create a private right of action or to provide
grounds for an action under section 42-110g of the general statutes.
Sec. 12. Section 42-515 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes,
as amended by section 5 of public act 25-113, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in this section and sections 42-516 to 42-526, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Abortion" means terminating a pregnancy for any purpose other
than producing a live birth.
(2) "Affiliate" means a legal entity that shares common branding with
another legal entity or controls, is controlled by or is under common
control with another legal entity. For the purposes of this subdivision,
"control" and "controlled" mean (A) ownership of, or the power to vote,
more than fifty per cent of the outstanding shares of any class of voting
security of a company, (B) control in any manner over the election of a
majority of the directors or of individuals exercising similar functions,
or (C) the power to exercise controlling influence over the management
of a company.
(3) "Authenticate" means to use reasonable means to determine that
a request to exercise any of the rights afforded under subdivisions (1) to
(4), inclusive, of subsection (a) of section 42-518, as amended by this act,
is being made by, or on behalf of, the consumer who is entitled to
exercise such consumer rights with respect to the personal data at issue.
Public Act No. 26-64 20 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
(4) "Biometric data" means data generated by automatic
measurements of an individual's biological characteristics, such as a
fingerprint, a voiceprint, eye retinas, irises or other unique biological
patterns or characteristics that are used to identify a specific individual.
"Biometric data" does not include (A) a digital or physical photograph,
(B) an audio or video recording, or (C) any data generated from a digital
or physical photograph, or an audio or video recording, unless such
data are generated to identify a specific individual.
(5) "Business associate" has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
(6) "Child" has the same meaning as provided in COPPA.
(7) "Consent" means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer's
freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous agreement to allow
the processing of personal data relating to the consumer. "Consent" may
include a written statement, including by electronic means, or any other
unambiguous affirmative action. "Consent" does not include (A)
acceptance of general or broad terms of use or a similar document that
contains descriptions of personal data processing along with other,
unrelated information, (B) hovering over, muting, pausing or closing a
given piece of content, or (C) agreement obtained through the use of
dark patterns.
(8) "Consumer" means an individual who is a resident of this state.
"Consumer" does not include an individual acting in a commercial or
employment context or as an employee, owner, director, officer or
contractor of a company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit
organization or government agency whose communications or
transactions with the controller occur solely within the context of that
individual's role with the company, partnership, sole proprietorship,
nonprofit organization or government agency.
(9) "Consumer health data" means any personal data that a controller
Public Act No. 26-64 21 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
uses to identify a consumer's physical or mental health condition,
diagnosis or status, and includes, but is not limited to, gender-affirming
health data and reproductive or sexual health data.
(10) "Consumer health data controller" means any controller that,
alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of
processing consumer health data.
(11) "Controller" means a person who, alone or jointly with others,
determines the purpose and means of processing personal data.
(12) "COPPA" means the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of
1998, 15 USC 6501 et seq., and the regulations, rules, guidance and
exemptions adopted pursuant to said act, as said act and such
regulations, rules, guidance and exemptions may be amended from
time to time.
(13) "Covered entity" has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
(14) "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or manipulated
with the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy,
decision-making or choice, and includes, but is not limited to, any
practice the Federal Trade Commission refers to as a "dark pattern".
(15) "Decision that produces any legal or similarly significant effect"
means any decision made by the controller, or on behalf of the
controller, that results in the provision or denial by the controller of any
financial or lending service, any housing, any insurance, any education
enrollment or opportunity, any criminal justice, any employment
opportunity or any health care service.
(16) "De-identified data" means data that cannot reasonably be used
to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identified or
identifiable individual, or a device linked to such individual, if the
controller that possesses such data (A) takes reasonable measures to
Public Act No. 26-64 22 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
ensure that such data cannot be associated with an individual, (B)
publicly commits to process such data only in a de-identified fashion
and not attempt to re-identify such data, and (C) contractually obligates
any recipients of such data to satisfy the criteria set forth in
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision.
(17) "Facial recognition technology" means any technology that
analyzes facial features in still images or video to uniquely and
personally identify a specific individual.
[(17)] (18) "Gender-affirming health care services" has the same
meaning as provided in section [52-571n] 52-571m.
[(18)] (19) "Gender-affirming health data" means any personal data
concerning an effort made by a consumer to seek, or a consumer's
receipt of, gender-affirming health care services.
[(19)] (20) "Geofence" means any technology that uses global
positioning coordinates, cell tower connectivity, cellular data, radio
frequency identification, wireless fidelity technology data or any other
form of location detection, or any combination of such coordinates,
connectivity, data, identification or other form of location detection, to
establish a virtual boundary.
[(20)] (21) "HIPAA" means the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, 42 USC 1320d et seq., as amended from time
to time.
[(21)] (22) "Identified or identifiable individual" means an individual
who can be readily identified, directly or indirectly.
[(22)] (23) "Institution of higher education" means any individual
who, or school, board, association, limited liability company or
corporation that, is licensed or accredited to offer one or more programs
of higher learning leading to one or more degrees.
Public Act No. 26-64 23 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
[(23)] (24) "Mental health facility" means any health care facility in
which at least seventy per cent of the health care services provided in
such facility are mental health services.
[(24)] (25) "Neural data" means any information that is generated by
measuring the activity of an individual's central nervous system.
[(25)] (26) "Nonprofit organization" means any organization that is
exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6) or
501(c)(12) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent
corresponding internal revenue code of the United States, as amended
from time to time.
[(26)] (27) "Person" means an individual, association, company,
limited liability company, corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship,
trust or other legal entity.
[(27)] (28) "Personal data" means any information that is linked or
reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual. "Personal
data" does not include de-identified data or publicly available
information.
[(28)] (29) "Precise geolocation data" means information derived from
technology, including, but not limited to, global positioning system
level latitude and longitude coordinates or other mechanisms, that
directly identifies the specific location of an individual with precision
and accuracy within a radius of one thousand seven hundred fifty feet.
"Precise geolocation data" does not include the content of
communications or any data generated by or connected to advanced
utility metering infrastructure systems or equipment for use by a utility.
[(29)] (30) "Process" and "processing" mean any operation or set of
operations performed, whether by manual or automated means, on
personal data or on sets of personal data, such as the collection, use,
storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion or modification of personal data.
Public Act No. 26-64 24 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
[(30)] (31) "Processor" means a person who processes personal data
on behalf of a controller.
[(31)] (32) "Profiling" means any form of automated processing
performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze or predict personal
aspects related to an identified or identifiable individual's economic
situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior,
location or movements.
[(32)] (33) "Protected health information" has the same meaning as
provided in HIPAA.
[(33)] (34) "Pseudonymous data" means personal data that cannot be
attributed to a specific individual without the use of additional
information, provided such additional information is kept separately
and is subject to appropriate technical and organizational measures to
ensure that the personal data are not attributed to an identified or
identifiable individual.
[(34)] (35) "Publicly available information" (A) means information
that (i) is [lawfully] made available [from] through federal, state or
[municipal] local government records or to the general public from
widely distributed media, or (ii) a controller or processor, or an affiliate
of a controller or processor, has a reasonable basis to believe [(I) a] that
the consumer has lawfully made available to the general public, [or (II)
has been lawfully made available to the general public from widely
distributed media,] and (B) does not include any (i) biometric data [that
can be associated with a specific] about a consumer [and were] collected
by a business without the consumer's [consent] knowledge, (ii) obscene
visual depiction, as such term is used in 18 USC 1460, as amended from
time to time, (iii) personal data that are created by combining any
information described in subdivision (28) of this section with any
information described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, (iv)
genetic data, unless such genetic data are made publicly available by the
Public Act No. 26-64 25 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
consumer, (v) information provided by a consumer on a publicly
accessible Internet web site or online service (I) which Internet web site
or online service is made available to the general public for
compensation or free of charge, and (II) where the consumer has
maintained a reasonable expectation of privacy in such information,
including, but not limited to, by restricting such information to a specific
audience, (vi) intimate image, as such term is used in section 53a-189c,
known to be nonconsensual, or (vii) intimate synthetically created
image, as such term is used in section 53a-189d, known to be
nonconsensual.
[(35)] (36) "Reproductive or sexual health care" means any health
care-related services or products rendered or provided concerning a
consumer's reproductive system or sexual well-being, including, but not
limited to, any such service or product rendered or provided concerning
(A) an individual health condition, status, disease, diagnosis, diagnostic
test or treatment, (B) a social, psychological, behavioral or medical
intervention, (C) a surgery or procedure, including, but not limited to,
an abortion, (D) a use or purchase of a medication, including, but not
limited to, a medication used or purchased for the purposes of an
abortion, (E) a bodily function, vital sign or symptom, (F) a
measurement of a bodily function, vital sign or symptom, or (G) an
abortion, including, but not limited to, medical or nonmedical services,
products, diagnostics, counseling or follow-up services for an abortion.
[(36)] (37) "Reproductive or sexual health data" means any personal
data concerning an effort made by a consumer to seek, or a consumer's
receipt of, reproductive or sexual health care.
[(37)] (38) "Reproductive or sexual health facility" means any health
care facility in which at least seventy per cent of the health care-related
services or products rendered or provided in such facility are
reproductive or sexual health care.
Public Act No. 26-64 26 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
[(38)] (39) "Sale of personal data" means the exchange of personal data
for monetary or other valuable consideration by the controller to a third
party. "Sale of personal data" does not include (A) the disclosure of
personal data to a processor that processes the personal data on behalf
of the controller, (B) the disclosure of personal data to a third party for
purposes of providing a product or service requested by the consumer,
(C) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the
controller, (D) the disclosure of personal data where the consumer
directs the controller to disclose the personal data or intentionally uses
the controller to interact with a third party, (E) the disclosure of personal
data that the consumer (i) intentionally made available to the general
public via a channel of mass media, and (ii) did not restrict to a specific
audience, or (F) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third
party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or
other transaction, or a proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or
other transaction, in which the third party assumes control of all or part
of the controller's assets.
[(39)] (40) "Sensitive data" means personal data that includes (A) data
revealing (i) racial or ethnic origin, (ii) religious beliefs, (iii) a mental or
physical health condition, diagnosis, disability or treatment, (iv) sex life,
sexual orientation or status as nonbinary or transgender, or (v)
citizenship or immigration status, (B) consumer health data, (C) genetic
or biometric data or information derived therefrom, (D) personal data
collected from an individual the controller has actual knowledge, or
wilfully disregards, is a child, (E) data concerning an individual's status
as a victim of crime, as defined in section 1-1k, (F) precise geolocation
data, (G) neural data, (H) a consumer's financial account number,
financial account log-in information or credit card or debit card number
that, in combination with any required access or security code,
password or credential, would allow access to a consumer's financial
account, or (I) government-issued identification number, including, but
not limited to, Social Security number, passport number, state
Public Act No. 26-64 27 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
identification card number or driver's license number, that applicable
law does not require to be publicly displayed.
[(40)] (41) "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements to
a consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal data
obtained or inferred from that consumer's activities over time and across
nonaffiliated Internet web sites or online applications to predict such
consumer's preferences or interests. "Targeted advertising" does not
include (A) advertisements based on activities within a controller's own
Internet web sites or online applications, (B) advertisements based on
the context of a consumer's current search query, visit to an Internet web
site or online application, (C) advertisements directed to a consumer in
response to the consumer's request for information or feedback, or (D)
processing personal data solely to measure or report advertising
frequency, performance or reach.
[(41)] (42) "Third party" means a person, such as a public authority,
agency or body, other than the consumer, controller or processor or an
affiliate of the processor or the controller.
[(42)] (43) "Trade secret" has the same meaning as provided in section
35-51.
Sec. 13. Subsection (a) of section 42-518 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 8 of public act 25-113, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) A consumer shall have the right to: (1) Confirm whether or not a
controller is processing the consumer's personal data and access such
personal data, including, but not limited to, any inferences about the
consumer derived from such personal data and whether a controller or
processor is processing a consumer's personal data for the purposes of
profiling to make a decision that produces any legal or similarly
Public Act No. 26-64 28 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
significant effect concerning a consumer, unless such confirmation or
access would require the controller to reveal a trade secret or the
controller is prohibited from disclosing such personal data under
subsection (e) of this section; (2) correct inaccuracies in the consumer's
personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and
the purposes of the processing of the consumer's personal data; (3)
delete (A) personal data provided by, or obtained about, the consumer,
(B) publicly available information that is (i) collated and combined to
create a consumer profile that is made available to a user of a publicly
accessible Internet web site for compensation or free of charge, or (ii)
made available for sale, or (C) any inference generated from the
information described in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision; (4)
obtain a copy of the consumer's personal data processed by the
controller, in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily
usable format that allows the consumer to transmit the data to another
controller without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by
automated means, provided such controller shall not be required to
reveal any trade secret; (5) opt out of the processing of the personal data
for purposes of (A) targeted advertising, (B) the sale of personal data,
except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 42-520,
as amended by this act, or (C) profiling in furtherance of any automated
decision that produces any legal or similarly significant effect
concerning the consumer; (6) if the consumer's personal data were
processed for the purposes of profiling in furtherance of any automated
decision that produced any legal or similarly significant effect
concerning the consumer, and if feasible, (A) question the result of such
profiling, (B) be informed of the reason that such profiling resulted in
such decision, (C) review the consumer's personal data that were
processed for the purposes of such profiling, and (D) if the profiling
decision concerned housing, taking into account the nature of the
personal data and the purposes for which such personal data were
processed, [allow the consumer to] correct any incorrect personal data
that were processed for the purposes of such profiling and have the
Public Act No. 26-64 29 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
profiling decision reevaluated based on the corrected personal data; and
(7) obtain from the controller a list of the third parties to which such
controller has sold the consumer's personal data or, if such controller
does not maintain a list of the third parties to which such controller has
sold the consumer's personal data, a list of all third parties to which such
controller has sold personal data, provided the controller shall not be
required to reveal any trade secret.
Sec. 14. Subsection (a) of section 42-520 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 9 of public act 25-113, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) (1) A controller shall: (A) Limit the collection of personal data to
what is reasonably necessary and proportionate in relation to the
purposes for which such data are processed, as disclosed to the
consumer; (B) unless the controller obtains the consumer's consent, not
process the consumer's personal data for any [material] new purpose
that is neither reasonably necessary to, nor compatible with, the
purposes that were disclosed to the consumer, pursuant to
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, taking into account (i) the
consumer's reasonable expectation regarding such personal data at the
time such personal data were collected based on the purposes that were
disclosed to the consumer pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision, (ii) the relationship that such new purpose bears to the
purposes that were disclosed to the consumer pursuant to
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, (iii) the impact that processing
such personal data for such new purpose might have on the consumer,
(iv) the relationship between the consumer and the controller and the
context in which the personal data were collected, and (v) the existence
of additional safeguards, including, but not limited to, encryption or
pseudonymization, in processing such personal data for such new
purpose; (C) establish, implement and maintain reasonable
Public Act No. 26-64 30 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
administrative, technical and physical data security practices to protect
the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of personal data
appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue; (D)
not process sensitive data concerning a consumer unless such
processing is reasonably necessary in relation to the purposes for which
such sensitive data are processed and without obtaining the consumer's
consent, or, in the case of the processing of sensitive data concerning a
consumer who the controller has actual knowledge, or wilfully
disregards, is a child, without processing such data in accordance with
COPPA; (E) not process personal data in violation of any law of this state
that prohibits unlawful discrimination against consumers, and any
evidence, or lack of evidence, concerning proactive anti-bias testing or
any similar proactive effort to avoid processing such data in violation of
such law, including, but not limited to, any evidence or lack of evidence
concerning the quality, efficacy, recency and scope of any such testing
or effort, the results of such testing or effort and the response to the
results of such testing or effort, shall be relevant to any claim available
for a violation of such law and any defense available thereto; (F) not
process personal data in violation of any federal law that prohibits
unlawful discrimination against consumers; (G) provide an effective
mechanism for a consumer to revoke the consumer's consent under this
section that is at least as easy as the mechanism by which the consumer
provided the consumer's consent and, upon revocation of such consent,
cease to process the data as soon as practicable, but not later than fifteen
days after the receipt of such request; (H) not sell the sensitive data of a
consumer without the consumer's consent; and (I) not process the
personal data of a consumer for purposes of targeted advertising, or sell
the consumer's personal data, under circumstances where a controller
has actual knowledge, or wilfully disregards, that the consumer is at
least thirteen years of age but younger than eighteen years of age. A
controller shall not discriminate against a consumer for exercising any
of the consumer rights contained in sections 42-515 to 42-525, inclusive,
as amended by this act, including denying goods or services, charging
Public Act No. 26-64 31 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
different prices or rates for goods or services or providing a different
level of quality of goods or services to the consumer.
(2) Nothing in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be construed to
require a controller to provide a product or service that requires the
personal data of a consumer which the controller does not collect or
maintain, or prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate,
level, quality or selection of goods or services to a consumer, including
offering goods or services for no fee, if the offering is in connection with
a consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards,
premium features, discounts or club card program.
(3) (A) No controller shall sell any consumer's precise geolocation
data.
(B) The provisions of subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall not
be construed to apply to the content of communications or any data
generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure
systems or equipment for use by a utility.
Sec. 15. Subsection (a) of section 42-521 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 10 of public act 25-113, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) (1) A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller and
shall assist the controller in meeting the controller's obligations under
sections 42-515 to 42-525, inclusive, as amended by this act. Such
assistance shall include: [(1)] (A) Taking into account the nature of
processing and insofar as is possible, to fulfill the controller's obligation
to respond to consumers' requests to exercise their rights under section
42-518, as amended by this act; [(2)] (B) taking into account the nature
of processing and the information available to the processor, by
assisting the controller in meeting the controller's obligations in relation
Public Act No. 26-64 32 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
to the security of processing the personal data and in relation to the
notification of a breach of security, as defined in section 36a-701b, of the
system of the processor, in order to meet the controller's obligations; and
[(3)] (C) providing necessary information to enable the controller to
conduct and document data protection assessments and impact
assessments.
(2) (A) No third party shall sell any consumer's precise geolocation
data.
(B) The provisions of subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall not
be construed to apply to the content of communications or any data
generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure
systems or equipment for use by a utility.
Sec. 16. Subsection (a) of section 42-524 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 12 of public act 25-113, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) (1) Nothing in sections 42-515 to 42-526, inclusive, as amended by
this act, shall be construed to restrict a controller's, processor's or
consumer health data controller's ability to: [(1)] (A) Comply with
federal, state or municipal ordinances or regulations; [(2)] (B) comply
with a civil, criminal or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
summons by federal, state, municipal or other governmental
authorities; [(3)] (C) cooperate with law enforcement agencies
concerning conduct or activity that the controller, processor or
consumer health data controller reasonably and in good faith believes
may violate federal, state or municipal ordinances or regulations; [(4)]
(D) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for or defend legal claims;
[(5)] (E) provide a product or service specifically requested by a
consumer; [(6)] (F) perform [under] pursuant to a contract to which a
consumer is a party, including fulfilling the terms of a written warranty;
Public Act No. 26-64 33 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
[(7)] (G) take steps at the request of a consumer prior to entering into a
contract; [(8)] (H) take immediate steps to protect an interest that is
essential for the life or physical safety of the consumer or another
individual, and where the processing cannot be manifestly based on
another legal basis; [(9)] (I) prevent, detect, protect against or respond to
security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or
deceptive activities or any illegal activity, preserve the integrity or
security of systems or investigate, report or prosecute those responsible
for any such action; [(10)] (J) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific
or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other
applicable ethics and privacy laws and is approved, monitored and
governed by an institutional review board that determines, or similar
independent oversight entities that determine, [(A)] (i) whether the
deletion of the information is likely to provide substantial benefits that
do not exclusively accrue to the controller or consumer health data
controller, [(B)] (ii) the expected benefits of the research outweigh the
privacy risks, and [(C)] (iii) whether the controller or consumer health
data controller has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate
privacy risks associated with research, including any risks associated
with re-identification; [(11)] (K) assist another controller, processor,
consumer health data controller or third party with any of the
obligations under sections 42-515 to 42-526, inclusive, as amended by
this act; or [(12)] (L) process personal data for reasons of public interest
in the area of public health, community health or population health, but
solely to the extent that such processing is [(A)] (i) subject to suitable
and specific measures to safeguard the rights of the consumer whose
personal data are being processed, and [(B)] (ii) under the responsibility
of a professional subject to confidentiality obligations under federal,
state or local law.
(2) (A) A controller or consumer health data controller that uses any
facial recognition technology on its premises to prevent, detect, protect
against or respond to security incidents, identity theft, fraud,
Public Act No. 26-64 34 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
harassment, malicious or deceptive activities or any illegal activity,
preserve the integrity or security of systems or investigate, report or
prosecute those responsible for any such action shall: (i) Exclusively use
such facial recognition technology to match still images or video to a
database maintained exclusively by such controller or consumer health
data controller; and (ii) post clearly legible signage at each entrance to
the premises where the facial recognition technology described in
subparagraph (A)(i) of this subdivision is in use, other than an entrance
to an area where access is restricted to authorized employees, (I) alerting
consumers entering such premises that facial recognition technology is
in use at such premises, and (II) that includes a conspicuous hyperlink
or quick response code that directs consumers to the facial recognition
technology policy maintained by such controller or consumer health
data controller.
(B) Each facial recognition technology policy maintained pursuant to
subparagraph (A)(ii)(II) of this subdivision: (i) Shall include contact
information for the office of the Attorney General; and (ii) may disclose
the controller's or consumer health data controller's policies concerning
interactions between such controller's or consumer health data
controller's loss prevention officers and consumers.
Sec. 17. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) As used in this section and
sections 18 and 19 of this act:
(1) "Biological sample" (A) means any material that is derived from
the human body and known to contain DNA, and (B) includes, but is
not limited to, any human tissue, blood, urine or saliva;
(2) "Consumer" means any individual who is physically present in
this state and a recipient, or a prospective recipient, of genetic testing;
(3) "De-identified data" means any data that cannot reasonably be
used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identified
Public Act No. 26-64 35 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
or identifiable individual if the direct-to-consumer genetic testing
company that possesses such data (A) takes administrative and
technical measures to ensure that such data cannot be associated with
an individual, (B) publicly commits to possess and use such data
exclusively in de-identified form and not to attempt to reidentify such
data, and (C) contractually obligates any recipient of such data to satisfy
the criteria set forth in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision;
(4) "Direct-to-consumer genetic testing company" or "company" (A)
means any person doing business in this state who, in the ordinary
course of such business, (i) offers genetic testing directly to a consumer,
or (ii) collects, uses or analyzes genetic data that a consumer has
provided to such person, and (B) does not include any individual who
(i) is licensed by this state to provide health care services, and (ii) while
acting within the scope of such individual's practice, orders genetic
testing for a medical purpose;
(5) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid;
(6) "Express consent" means an affirmative response by a consumer
to a clear, meaningful and prominent notice regarding the collection,
use, retention or disclosure of the consumer's genetic data for a specific
purpose;
(7) "Genetic data" (A) means any data, regardless of format,
concerning an individual's genetic characteristics, (B) includes, but is
not limited to, (i) any raw sequence data that result from sequencing all,
or any portion of, an individual's DNA, (ii) any genotypic or phenotypic
information that is obtained by analyzing an individual's raw sequence
data, and (iii) any information that (I) concerns a condition affecting an
individual's health, (II) the individual reports to a direct-to-consumer
genetic testing company, and (III) the direct-to-consumer genetic testing
company analyzes in connection with the individual's raw sequence
data and uses for scientific research or product development, and (C)
Public Act No. 26-64 36 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
does not include de-identified data;
(8) "Genetic testing" means (A) any laboratory test performed on an
individual's complete DNA sequence, or one or more of an individual's
DNA regions, chromosomes, genes or gene products, for purposes of
determining the presence or absence of any genetic characteristic, and
(B) any interpretation of an individual's genetic data; and
(9) "Person" means any individual, association, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, trust or other legal entity.
Sec. 18. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) A consumer shall have a
property right in, and shall retain the right to exercise exclusive control
over, any biological sample that is derived from the consumer's body
and provided to, or used by, a direct-to-consumer genetic testing
company, as well as the results of any genetic testing conducted on the
consumer's DNA by a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company.
Such right to exercise exclusive control includes, but is not limited to,
the right to exercise exclusive control over the collection, use, retention,
maintenance, disclosure or destruction of such biological sample and
results.
Sec. 19. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) A direct-to-consumer
genetic testing company shall:
(1) At all times transact its business and conduct its affairs in a
manner that is consistent with a consumer's rights under section 18 of
this act;
(2) Prior to accepting any biological sample, genetic data or payment
from a consumer, disclose to the consumer the company's policies and
procedures concerning the collection, use and disclosure of genetic data;
(3) Display, in a prominent and publicly accessible location on the
company's Internet web site, a privacy notice disclosing such company's
Public Act No. 26-64 37 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
policies and procedures concerning the collection, use, access,
disclosure, transfer, security, retention and deletion of a consumer's
data and the consumer's consent thereto;
(4) Prior to collecting, using or disclosing a consumer's genetic data,
obtain the consumer's express consent for such collection, use or
disclosure after disclosing to such consumer (A) the company's policies
and procedures concerning use of the genetic data such company
collects from consumers, (B) the identity of each person who may access
the results of genetic testing performed by the company, including, but
not limited to, any vendor or service provider for such company who
may access such results, and (C) the manner in which the company may
disclose such consumer's genetic data;
(5) In addition to the express consent required under subdivision (4)
of this subsection, separately obtain a consumer's express consent to (A)
disclose or transfer the consumer's genetic data to any person other than
a vendor or service provider for the company, prior to disclosing or
transferring such genetic data to such person, (B) use the consumer's
genetic data for any purpose other than the primary purpose for which
the company offered genetic testing directly to such consumer, prior to
using such genetic data for such other purpose, or (C) retain the
consumer's biological sample for any period following completion of
the genetic testing for which such consumer provided such biological
sample, prior to retaining such biological sample for such period;
(6) Obtain informed consent from a consumer in accordance with the
federal policy for the protection of human subjects under 45 CFR 46, as
amended from time to time, for any disclosure or transfer of the
consumer's genetic data to a third party for research purposes or
research conducted under the control of the company for purposes of
publication or generalizable knowledge;
(7) Not disclose the results of any genetic testing performed on a
Public Act No. 26-64 38 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
consumer's DNA to any person other than the consumer, unless (A) the
company has obtained such consumer's express consent to such
disclosure, or (B) such disclosure is made to a person acting pursuant to
a court order, warrant or subpoena;
(8) Not disclose a consumer's genetic data to (A) the consumer's
employer, (B) any person who, in the ordinary course of business, (i)
offers health insurance, life insurance or long-term care insurance
coverage in this state or any other state, or (ii) provides information or
data to any insurer, as defined in section 38a-1 of the general statutes,
health care center, as defined in section 38a-175 of the general statutes,
or fraternal benefit society, as described in section 38a-595 of the general
statutes, for purposes of underwriting or rating of risks, or (C) any third
party which the company knows, or reasonably should know, intends
to use such genetic data for purposes of marketing, including, but not
limited to, targeted advertising;
(9) Implement reasonable security measures to protect a consumer's
biological sample or genetic data from any unauthorized access,
destruction, use, modification or disclosure; and
(10) Implement a process for a consumer to (A) access the consumer's
genetic data from the company, (B) require the company to delete the
consumer's genetic data, (C) require the company to destroy, and
confirm that such company has destroyed, the consumer's biological
sample, and (D) revoke the consumer's consent for (i) the company to
use such consumer's genetic data for research purposes, or (ii) any third
party to which the company has provided such consumer's genetic data
to use such genetic data for research purposes.
(b) Any violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed an
unfair or deceptive trade practice under subsection (a) of section 42-110b
of the general statutes and shall be enforced solely by the Attorney
General. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a private
Public Act No. 26-64 39 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
right of action or to provide grounds for an action under section 42-110g
of the general statutes.
Sec. 20. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cable operator" has the same meaning as provided in 47 USC 522,
as amended from time to time;
(2) "Commercial advertisement" has the same meaning as such term
is used in the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation Act, P.L.
111-311, as amended from time to time;
(3) "Consumer" means any person who is physically present in this
state and is a recipient, or a prospective recipient, of a streaming video
service;
(4) "Multichannel video programming distributor" has the same
meaning as provided in 47 USC 522, as amended from time to time;
(5) "Person" means any individual, association, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, trust or other legal entity;
(6) "Streaming video service" means any service through which any
video content, including, but not limited to, any video programming, is
made available directly to consumers through a distribution method
that uses the Internet protocol;
(7) "Television broadcast station" has the same meaning as provided
in 47 USC 325, as amended from time to time; and
(8) "Video programming" has the same meaning as provided in 47
USC 613, as amended from time to time.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, a streaming video service shall not
transmit to a consumer the audio of a commercial advertisement at a
volume that is louder than the volume of the video content that
Public Act No. 26-64 40 of 41

Substitute Senate Bill No. 4
accompanies the commercial advertisement, consistent with the
regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission
pursuant to the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation Act,
P.L. 111-311, for television broadcast stations, cable operators and other
multichannel video programming distributors.
(c) Any violation of the provisions of subsection (b) of this section
shall constitute an unfair trade practice for the purposes of subsection
(a) of section 42-110b of the general statutes and shall be enforced solely
by the Attorney General. The provisions of section 42-110g of the
general statutes shall not apply to any such violation. Nothing in this
section shall be construed as providing the basis for a private right of
action for any violation of subsection (b) of this section.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 27, 2026
Public Act No. 26-64 41 of 41